Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2604.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5729YH (3) 91 dg/ko H.F. 2604 Section 1. Section 232.68, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. âChildâ means any person under the age of eighteen years , 3 including an unborn child as defined in section 146A.1 . 4 Sec. 2. Section 232.68, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 5 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 6 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (12) The use of a controlled substance, 7 as defined in section 124.101, by a pregnant female responsible 8 for the care of a child. 9 Sec. 3. Section 232.71B, subsection 1, paragraph a, 10 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 11 (1) Upon acceptance of a report of child abuse, the 12 department shall commence a child abuse assessment when the 13 report alleges child abuse as defined in section 232.68, 14 subsection 2 , paragraph âaâ , subparagraphs (1) through (3) and 15 subparagraphs (5) through (11) (12) , or which alleges child 16 abuse as defined in section 232.68, subsection 2 , paragraph âaâ , 17 subparagraph (4), that also alleges imminent danger, death, or 18 injury to a child. 19